en: soured milk, cultured milk, fermented milk
ca: llet àcida
cv: Турăх
da: Tykmælk
de: Dickmilch, Setzmilch, Stockmilch, Sauermilch
es: Leche agria
et: Hapupiim
fi: piimä
fr: lait aigre, lait caillé
hr: kiselo mlijeko
hu: savanyított tej
is: Súrmjólk
it: Latte acido
ko: 산유
la: Oxygala
lt: Rūgpienis
mk: Кисело млеко
nb: Kulturmelk
nl: Dikmelk, Hangop, gefermenteerde melk
nn: Surmjølk
pl: Zsiadłe mleko
pt: Leite fermentado
ro: Lapte acru
ru: Простокваша
sl: Kislo mleko
so: Caano ciir
sv: Surmjölk
uk: Кисляк (молоко)
zh: 酸乳

en: filmjölk
xx: filmjölk
de: Filmjölk
ja: フィールミョルク
ko: 필미엘크
nn: filmjølk
sv: filmjölk, fil

en: buttermilk, butter milk, sweet cream buttermilk
af: karringmelk
am: አሬራ
ar: حليب رائب, حليبب
bg: мътеница
br: laezh-ribod
ca: sèrum de mantega
cs: podmáslí
cv: уйран
cy: llaeth enwyn
da: kærnemælk
de: Buttermilch, reine Buttermilch
eo: buterlakto
es: suero de mantequilla, leche mazada
et: pett
fa: آب‌دوغ
fi: kirnupiimä, kirnumaito
fr: babeurre, bas-beurre, lait battu, lait fermenté
fy: sûpe
ga: bláthach
gd: blàthach
gu: છાશ
he: חובצה
hi: छाछ
hr: mlaćenica, mlačenica, fermentirano mlijeko
hu: író
id: susu mentega
io: butro-lakto
is: áfir
it: latticello
ja: バターミルク
kn: ಮಜ್ಜಿಗೆ
ko: 우락유
li: karnemèlk
lt: pasukos
lv: paniņas
mk: матеница
ml: മോര്
mo: babeurre
mr: ताक
ms: susu mentega
nb: kjernemelk
ne: मोही
nl: karnemelk
om: baaduu
pl: maślanka, maślanki
pt: leitelho
ro: babeurre
ru: пахта
sa: तक्रम्
sk: cmar
sl: pinjenec
sv: kärnmjölk
ta: மோர்
te: మజ్జిగ
uk: сколотини
zh: 酪漿

en: buttermilk solids
es: sólidos de manteca
fr: Solides du babeurre
hr: krute tvari mlaćenice
it: Solidi di latticello

en: cheese
af: Kaas
am: ፎርማጆ
an: Queso
ar: جبن
ay: Kisu
az: Pendir
ba: Сыр
be: Сыр
bg: Сирене
bn: চিজ
bo: ཆུར་བ།
br: Keuz
bs: Sir
ca: formatge
ce: Нехча
co: casgiu
cs: sýr
cu: сꙑръ
cv: Чăкăт
cy: Caws
da: ost
de: Käse
dv: ޗީޒު
ee: notsi babla
el: τυρί
eo: fromaĝo
es: queso
et: juust
eu: Gazta
fa: پنیر
fi: juusto
fj: jisi
fo: ostur
fr: fromage
fy: tsiis
ga: Cáis
gd: Càise
gl: Queixo
gn: Kesu
gu: ચીઝ
gv: Caashey
he: גבינה
hi: चीज़
hr: sir, sirevi, sireva
ht: Fromaj
hu: sajt, sajtok
hy: պանիր
ia: Caseo
id: keju
ie: casco
ig: chiz
io: Fromajo
is: Ostur
it: formaggio, formaggi
ja: チーズ
jv: Kèju
ka: ყველი
kk: Ірімшік
kl: immussuaq
km: ប្រូម៉ាស
kn: ಗಿಣ್ಣು
ko: 치즈
ku: Penîr
ky: Сыр
la: Caseus
lb: Kéis
li: kieës
lo: ເນີຍແຂງ
lt: Sūris
lv: siers
mg: frômazy
mk: сирење
ml: പാൽക്കട്ടി
mn: Бяслаг
mr: चीझ
ms: keju
mt: ġobon
my: ဒိန်ခဲ
nb: ost
ne: पनिर
nl: kaas
nn: ost
nv: Géeso
ny: tchizi
oc: Formatge
or: ଚିଜ୍
os: Цыхт
pa: ਪਨੀਰ
pl: ser, sery, sera, serowy, serowe, serowa, serowych, serowego, serowej, serem, serów
ps: پوڅه
pt: queijo
qu: Kisu
rm: chaschiel
ro: brânză
ru: сыр, сыры полутвердые
rw: ifromaje
sa: दधिकम्
sc: Casu
sd: پنير
se: vuostá
sh: Sir
si: Sir
sk: Syr
sl: sir
so: jiss
sq: djathi
sr: сир
st: kase
su: Kéju
sv: ost
sw: Jibini
ta: பாலாடைக்கட்டி
te: జున్ను
tg: Панир
th: เนยแข็ง
ti: ጅብና
tk: Peýnir
tl: Keso
tr: peynir
tt: сырлар
uk: сир
ur: پنیر
uz: Pishloq
vi: Pho mát
vo: fromad
wa: froumadje
wo: formaas
xh: itshizi
yi: קעז
yo: wàràkàsì
zh: 乾酪
zu: Ushizi

en: mixed cheese, cheese blend
de: Käsemischung
es: mezcla de quesos
hr: miješani sir
it: formaggio misto

en: cured cheese, mature cheese
ca: formatge curat
de: gereifter Käse
es: queso curado, queso madurado
hr: sušeni sir
it: formaggio stagionato
pl: ser wędzony

fr: fromages râpées séchés
ca: formatge ratllat sec
es: queso rallado seco

en: cheese made from pasteurized milk
bg: сирене произведено от пастьоризирано мляко
ca: formatge elaborat amb llet pasteuritzada
de: Käse aus pasteurisierter Milch
es: queso elaborado con leche pasteurizada
fi: pastöroidusta maidosta valmistetut juustot
fr: Fromage fabriqué à partir de lait pasteurisé
hr: sir od pasteriziranog mlijeka
hu: pasztőrözött tejből készült sajt
it: Formaggio fatto con latte pastorizzato

en: Soft cheese made from pasteurized milk
ca: formatge suau de llet pasteuritzada
de: Weichkäse aus pasteurisierter Milch
es: queso blando de leche pasteurizada
fi: pastöroidusta maidosta valmistetut pehmeät juustot
fr: fromage à pâte molle au lait pasteurisé
hr: meki sir od pasteriziranog mlijeka
hu: pasztőrözött tejből készült lágysajt
it: Formaggio a pasta molle di latte pastorizzato

de: Bergkäse
hu: hegyisajt

en: cow cheese
bg: краве сирене
ca: formatge de vaca
de: Käse aus Kuhmilch
es: queso de vaca
fi: lehmänmaitojuusto, lehmänmaidosta valmistettu juusto
fr: fromage de vache, fromage au lait de vache
hr: kravlji sir
hu: tehénsajt
it: formaggio vaccino
nl: koekaas
pl: ser krowi, krowi ser
ro: brânză de vaci

fr: fromage au lait de vache bio thermisé
ca: formatge de llet de vaca ecológic
es: queso de leche de vaca ecológica

fr: fromage au lait de vache pasteurisé
ca: formatge de llet de vaca pasteuritzada
es: queso de leche de vaca pasteurizada

fr: Fromage au lait cru de vache
ca: formatge de llet de vaca crua
es: queso de leche de vaca cruda

en: cow's cheese with chives
hr: kravlji sir s vlascom

en: goat cheese, chèvre cheese
ar: جبن الماعز
bg: козе сирене
bn: ছাগল পনির
ca: formatge de llet de cabra, formatge de cabra
cs: kozí sýr
da: gedeost
de: Ziegenkäse
el: κατσικίσιο τυρί
es: queso de cabra
et: kitsejuust
eu: Ahuntz gazta
fi: kutunjuusto, vuohenjuusto
fr: fromage de chèvre, fromage de chèvre affiné, fromage de chèvre affiné fondu
he: גבינת עזים
hr: kozji sir
hu: kecskesajt
hy: պանիր այծի կաթից
is: Geitaostur
it: formaggio di capra
ja: シェーブルチーズ
kn: თხის ყველი
ko: 염소젖 치즈
li: geitekies
lt: Ožkos sūris
ms: keju kambing
nb: geitost
nl: geitenkaas
nn: geitost
pa: ਬਕਰੀ ਦਾ ਪਨੀਰ
pl: ser kozi, kozi ser
pt: queijo de cabra
ro: Brânză de capră
ru: козий сыр
sh: Kozji sir
sq: Djathi i bardhë i deles
sr: козји сир
sw: getost
ta: ஆட்டு பாலாடைகட்டி
tr: keçi peyniri
zh: 契福瑞芝士

fr: fromage de chèvre frais
ca: formatge fresc de llet de cabra
de: Ziegenfrischkäse
es: queso fresco de cabra

fr: fromage de chèvre au lait pasteurisé, fromage au lait de chèvre pasteurisé
ca: formatge de llet de cabra pasteuritzada
es: queso de leche de cabra pasteurizada

en: Crottin cheese, Crottin cheese from goat's milk
fr: crottin, Crottin de chèvre sans précision
hr: crottin sir
it: formaggio Crottin